Tennessee, session 114, SB2407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-106(b)(2), is amended by
deleting subdivision (B) and substituting instead the following:
(B) Has completed all EPP coursework, except for the clinical practice required
in § 49-5-5604 and the rules of the state board of education; this subdivision (b)(2)(B)
applies to an individual who has begun, but not completed, the clinical practice required
pursuant to § 49-5-5604 at the time the temporary clinical permit is issued;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-106(g), is amended by adding
the following language at the end of subdivision (3):
This subdivision (g)(3) is satisfied if the amount of time the individual completed
toward meeting the clinical practice required pursuant to § 49-5-5604 before the
individual was issued a temporary clinical permit combined with the amount of
time the individual taught under the temporary clinical permit is at least equal to
the amount of time required for candidates of the EPP in which the individual is
enrolled to complete the clinical practice required pursuant to § 49-5-5604.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2407
012023
- 1 -